Oklahoma, session 2026, SB261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 53 O.S. 2021, Section 415, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 415. Grants awarded under the Heritage Preservation


Grant Program shall not may be used for capital improvements, or for


repairs. Grants may be used only, or for operating expenses for


eligible entities engaged in collecting, preserving, and sharing


Oklahoma heritage. Preference will shall be given to projects


affecting collections, educational programs, and exhibits. Grants


may be used to support the development of strategic plans.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1260 RD 12/30/2024 7:14:18 PM



Req. No. 1260 Page 1